Montana, session 2025, SB126.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Normal wear. Normal wear includes but is not limited to:
(1) a reasonable number of small nail holes in walls for hanging picture frames and other objects;
(2) a reasonable number of scuffs and chips on painted walls; and
(3) visible wear on carpets and other flooring in high-traffic areas of a residence.

Section 2. Section 70-25-201, MCA, is amended to read:
"70-25-201. Security deposit -- deductions authorized therefrom. (1) A landlord renting property
covered by this chapter may deduct from the security deposit a sum equal to the damage alleged to have been
caused by the tenant, together with a sum equal to the unpaid rent, late charges, utilities, penalties due under
lease provisions, and other money owing to the landlord at the time of deduction, including rent owed under 70-
24-441(3), and a sum for actual cleaning expenses, including a reasonable charge for the landlord's labor but
that may not exceed prevailing costs for a professional cleaner.
(2) At the request of either party, the premises may be inspected within 1 week prior to termination
of the tenancy.
(3) (a) Cleaning charges may not be imposed for normal maintenance performed on a cyclical
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 126

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 126.1
basis by the landlord as noted by the landlord at the time that the tenant occupies the space unless the landlord
is forced to perform this maintenance because of negligence of the tenant.
(b) Additionally, cleaning Cleaning charges may not be deducted until written notice has been
given to the tenant. The notice must include the cleaning not accomplished by the tenant and the additional
level and type or types of cleaning that need to be done by the tenant to bring the premises back to its condition
at the time of its renting. After the delivery of the notice, the tenant has 24 hours to complete the required
cleaning, unless the rental agreement is has already terminated pursuant to 70-24-427 or 70-33-427 and the
landlord has a pending claim for actual damages filed in court. If notice is mailed by certified mail, service of the
notice is considered to have been made 3 days after the date of the mailing.
(c) A tenant who fails to notify the landlord of the intent to vacate or who vacates the premises
without notice relieves the landlord of the requirement of giving notice and allows the landlord to deduct the
cleaning charges from the deposit, or the landlord may leave a copy of the notice in a conspicuous location in
the rental unit and notify the tenant by e-mail, phone, or text, and notice is considered delivered.
(4) A person may not deduct or withhold from the security deposit any amount for purposes other
than those set forth in this section.
(5) Deductions are not authorized for painting or recarpeting at the end of a tenancy that has
lasted for at least 2 years."

Section 3. Section 70-25-202, MCA, is amended to read:
"70-25-202. List of damages and refund -- delivery to departing tenant. (1) Except as provided in
subsection (2):
(a) (i) Each landlord, within 30 21 days subsequent to after the termination of a tenancy or within
30 21 days subsequent to after a surrender and acceptance of the leasehold premises, whichever occurs first,
shall provide the departing tenant with a written list of any rent due and any damage and cleaning charges,
brought after the provisions of 70-25-201 have been followed, with regard to the leasehold premises that the
landlord alleges are the responsibility of the tenant.
(ii) Delivery of the list must be accompanied by payment of the difference, if any, between the
security deposit and the permitted charges set forth in 70-25-201. Delivery must be accomplished by mailing
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 126

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 126.1
the list and refund to the new address provided by the tenant or, if a new address is not provided, to the
tenant's last-known address.
(b) If charges are assessed for cleaning performed by a professional cleaner, delivery of the list
must include a copy of the professional cleaner's bill.
(b)(c) If, after inspection, there are no damages to the premises, no cleaning required, and no rent
unpaid and if the tenant can demonstrate that no utilities are unpaid by the tenant, the landlord shall return the
security deposit within 10 21 days by mailing it to the new address provided by the tenant or, if a new address
is not provided, to the tenant's last-known address.
(c)(d) It is not a wrongful withholding of security deposit funds if the landlord mails the funds to the
last-known address of a tenant who has departed and the tenant does not receive the funds because the tenant
has not given the landlord the tenant's new address, but the landlord remains liable to the tenant for the amount
due the tenant.
(2) This section does not apply if a rental agreement is terminated pursuant to 70-24-427 or 70-33-
427 and the landlord has a pending claim for actual damages filed in court."

Section 4. Section 70-25-204, MCA, is amended to read:
"70-25-204. Wrongful withholding of security deposit -- action. (1) A person who wrongfully
withholds a residential property security deposit or any portion of the deposit is liable in damages to the tenant
in a civil action for an amount equal to the sum determined to have been wrongfully withheld or deducted. The
attorney fees may be awarded to the prevailing party at the discretion of the court. The burden of proof of
damages caused by the tenant to the leasehold premises is on the landlord.
(2) An action may not be maintained by a tenant for any amount wrongfully withheld or deducted
prior to:
(a) the tenant's receipt from the landlord or the landlord's agent of a written denial of the sum
alleged to be wrongfully detained;
(b) the expiration of a 30-day 21-day period after the termination of a tenancy;
(c) the expiration of a 30-day 21-day period after surrender and acceptance of the leasehold
premises; or
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 126

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 126.1
(d) the expiration of a 10-day 21-day period after the landlord has indicated there were no
damages to the premises, no cleaning was required, no rent was unpaid, and no utilities were unpaid by the
tenant."

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 70, chapter 25, part 2, and the provisions of Title 70, chapter 25, part 2, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 126